Hawaii statutes.
§607-1 Power of supreme court with respect
to costs and fees. The supreme court shall have power by rule of court,
from time to time, to revise, amend, add to, or eliminate any of the items of
costs and fees provided in this chapter, to prescribe such costs and fees as it
deems reasonable in all cases not therein provided for, and to prescribe the
amount to be paid in advance to the clerk of any court in any proceeding on
account of the costs and fees. All fees prescribed by the supreme court by
rule of court for electronic document certification, electronic copies of
documents, and for providing bulk access to electronic court records and
compilations of data shall be deposited into the judiciary computer system
special fund. [CC 1859, §1282; RL 1925, §2554; RL 1935, §3803; am L 1935, c 55,
§1; RL 1945, §9741; RL 1955, §219-1; HRS §607-1; am L 1974, c 145, §5; am L
2004, c 230, §§3, 6; am L 2006, c 21, §1; am L 2011, c 60, §2]

Case Notes

Cited: 35 H. 682, 684; 44 H. 147, 149, 355 P.2d 40; 51 H.
346, 348, 461 P.2d 140.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next